Hawaii statutes.
[§436B-14.6] Licensure by
endorsement or licensure by reciprocity; experience requirements. (a)
Unless otherwise provided by law, an applicant for licensure by endorsement or
licensure by reciprocity who is a nonresident military spouse may demonstrate
competency in a specific profession or vocation as determined by the licensing
authority in lieu of a requirement that the applicant has worked or practiced
in that profession or vocation for a specified period of time prior to the
application for licensure by endorsement or licensure by reciprocity.

(b) The licensing authority shall expedite
consideration of the application and issuance of a license by endorsement or
license by reciprocity to a nonresident military spouse who meets the
requirements of this section. [L 2012, c 247, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next